Utah statutes.
53B-15-104.   Lack of response.

If a written response or payment of delinquent installments is not received by the college, university, or board within 15 days from the date of receipt of the notice by the public employee, the college, university, or board may determine the balance due and proceed to collect the balance as provided in Section 53B-15-105.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

